Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ast_ES.aff
# =======================================================================================
#                        Correutor normativu d'ortografía asturiana
#                                    Ficheru d'afixos
# =======================================================================================
# Copyright (C) 2010 Softastur <alministradores@softastur.org>, <esbardu@softastur.org>
#
# This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or
# modify it under the terms of the GNU General Public License
# as published by the Free Software Foundation; either version 2
# of the License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program; if not, write to the Free Software
# Foundation, Inc., 59 Temple Place - Suite 330, Boston, MA
# 02111-1307, USA.
# =======================================================================================
# Fontes: Diccionariu de l'Academia de la Llingua Asturiana (2000), 1ª Ed.
#         Normes ortográfiques de l'Academia de la Llingua Asturiana (2005), 6ª Ed.
#         Gramática de la Llingua Asturiana (2001), 3ª Ed.
# =======================================================================================

# set
SET UTF-8

# try  
TRY easirtocnñlumdpgvfbqjwxyzháéíóúüḥḷ-'EASIRTOCNÑLUMDPGVFBQJWXYZHÁÉÍÓÚÜḤḶ

# Regles
#     A  Apostrofaciones al entamu de pallabra (provisional)
#     B  Apostrofaciones a lo cabero de pallabra (provisional)
#     C  (contraiciones)
#     D  Pronomes personales enclíticos en verbos (de momentu solo infinitivos)
#     E  Pallabres variables namái en númberu (regla xeneral)
#     e  Pallabres variables namái en númberu (regles especiales)
#     F  Pallabres variables en xéneru y númberu
#     f  Pallabres variables en xéneru y númberu que nun almiten neutru (xeneralmente profesiones)
#     G  Verbos regulares y con variantes ortográfiques menores
#     H  Verbos irregulares
#     I  Participios regulares y con variantes ortográfiques menores
#     J  
#     K  
#     L  
#     M  
#     N  Variantes de nomes propios
#     O  
#     P  
#     Q  
#     R  
#     S  
#     T  
#     U  
#     V  
#     W  
#     Y  
#     Z  

# Apostrofaciones al entamu de pallabra (provisional)
PFX A Y 9
PFX A   0      l'          [AÁEÉIÍOÓUÚHaáeéiíoóuúh] # l'arca, l'historial
PFX A   0      n'          [AÁEÉIÍOÓUÚHaáeéiíoóuúh] # n'arca, n'historial
PFX A   0      d'          [AÁEÉIÍOÓUÚHaáeéiíoóuúh] # d'arca, d'historial
PFX A   0      p'          [aA]                     # p'arriba
PFX A   0      p'          [hH][aA]                 # p'haza
PFX A   0      qu'         [AÁEÉIÍOÓUÚHaáeéiíoóuúh] # qu'ellí, qu'haza
PFX A   0      m'          [AÁEÉIÍOÓUÚHaáeéiíoóuúh] # m'abulta
PFX A   0      t'          [AÁEÉIÍOÓUÚHaáeéiíoóuúh] # t'abulta
PFX A   0      s'          [AÁEÉIÍOÓUÚHaáeéiíoóuúh] # s'abulta

# Apostrofaciones a lo cabero de pallabra (provisional)
SFX B Y 1
SFX B   0      'l          [aáeéiíoóuú]      # que'l

# (Contraiciones)
