Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ast_ES.dic
abanastrar/ADG
abarcada/ABe
abasón/Ae
abdome/ABe
abeduriu/ABE
abetunadura/ABE
abinar/ADG
ablanquiador/AF
ablanu/ABE
abocu/ABF
abondosu/ABF
aborrinaría/AB
abreviaderu/ABE
abridor/AF
abrugamientu/ABE
abultar/ADG
abusador/AF
acabadura/ABE
academicista/ABE
acambamientu/ABE
acaponáu/ABF
acarriar/ADG
aceba/ABE
acebéu/ABE
aceiteru/ABF
aceptamientu/ABE
aceutamientu/ABE
achináu/ABF
achisbador/AF
acicar/ADG
aclimatación/Ae
acollerar/ADG
acompañamientu/ABE
acoplinar/ADG
acorazamientu/ABE
acorrar/ADG
acoxicar/ADG
actitú/ABe
acuchellar/ADG
acuriosador/AF
acuriosamientu/ABE
adala/ABE
adeprender/ADH
adobera/ABE
adormentar/ADG
aduaneru/ABf
adversativu/ABF
afaitar/ADG
afarolar/ADG
afectu/ABE
afemamientu/ABE
afianzamientu/ABE
afirmación/Ae
afloxar/ADG
afónicu/ABF
aforfugamientu/ABE
aforquetáu/ABF
afrellar/ADG
afuneru/ABE
agachón/AF
agarrada/ABe
agarrador/AE
agazapáu/ABF
agostar/ADG
agregu/ABE
agripina/ABE
agrónomu/ABF
aguantaderu/ABF
agucia/ABE
aguixera/ABE
aguiyonada/ABe
aguxanar/ADG
aigla/ABE
alagüezu/ABE
albacora/ABE
albanciada/ABe
albarucu/ABF
alborotar/ADG
alcance/ABE
alcanforáu/ABF
alcordar/ADH
aldromerar/ADG
alevecáu/ABF
alfa/ABE
alfombreru/ABf
alguera/ABE
alimenticiu/ABF
alistanu/ABF
allacazáu/ABF
allargadera/ABE
allendadura/ABE
alliñu/ABE
allistáu/ABF
allombrizar/ADG
allugar/ADG
alministración/Ae
aloria/ABE
alotiar/ADG
altabar/AE
altiqueru/ABE
alverbializar/ADG
álxebra/ABE
amachambrar/ADG
amalotar/ADG
amantegáu/ABF
amargurientu/ABF
amarruxáu/ABF
amatagar/ADG
ambolantín/Af
amechadura/ABE
amenador/AF
amestadura/ABE
amnesia/ABE
amontesinar/ADG
amormiar/ADG
amorráu/ABF
amortización/Ae
ampariar/ADG
amurueganera/ABE
analíu/ABF
anchoa/ABE
anchu/ABF
andana/ABE
andoliar/ADG
anduelu/AB
andurbial/AE
aneudóticu/ABF
anglicanu/ABF
anguileru/ABE
angula/ABE
animalizar/ADG
anotación/Ae
ante/AB
antecedencia/ABE
antesala/ABE
anticuariu/ABf
antimoniu/ABE
antinómicu/ABF
antoxana/ABE
anubligar/ADG
anuru/ABE
anzolar/ADH
añoñar/ADG
apaecencia/ABE
apalpar/ADG
apañucar/ADG
aparatosu/ABF
apariencia/ABE
apatonar/ADG
apedriador/AF
apellativu/ABE
apercollar/ADG
aperiu/ABE
apestañéu/ABE
apichar/ADG
apincionar/ADG
aplacamientu/ABE
apode/AB
apoderamientu/ABE
aponedoriu/ABE
aportación/Ae
apóstrofu/ABE
aprendiz/Af
aprevíu/ABF
apropiación/Ae
apunchalar/ADG
apuru/ABE
arácnidu/ABE
arador/AE
arba/ABE
arboladura/ABE
arcanu/ABE
archiducal/AE
ardidura/ABE
arenizu/ABF
areta/ABE
argañar/ADG
argüellu/ABE
arimu/ABE
aritmética/ABE
armadura/ABE
arón/AF
arrabliscar/ADG
arraladura/ABE
arramaliar/ADG
arranllar/ADG
arrasguñatu/ABE
arrebalgar/ADG
arrebexu/ABE
arrecendedor/AF
arrefonfiñar/ADG
arrellumante/ABE
arrendador/AF
arrescuñadura/ABE
arrescuñamientu/ABE
arrianismu/ABE
arrincamientu/ABE
arrodéu/ABE
arronchón/AF
arropu/ABE
arrozal/AE
arsenal/AE
articulación/Ae
artiodáctilu/ABE
aru/ABE
asaináu/ABF
ascuaral/AE
asentir/ADH
aserraderu/ABE
asfixante/ABE
asoberar/ADG
asombramientu/ABE
aspavientar/ADG
aspectu/ABE
astencionista/ABE
ástur/AE
atabacáu/ABF
atadura/ABE
atambar/ADG
atardecerín/Ae
ateísmu/ABE
aterecer/ADG
atientar/ADG
atléticu/ABF
atocináu/ABF
atoñada/ABe
atorveyanar/ADG
atraguiláu/ABF
atrevencia/ABE
atroncar/ADG
atumbanáu/ABF
aúda/ABE
aullada/ABe
aunión/Ae
autocar/AE
autónomu/ABF
autovía/ABE
avalumar/ADG
aventaderu/ABE
averdazáu/ABF
avientu/ABE
avisar/ADG
axilistráu/ABF
axugadura/ABE
ayeri/AB
azor/AE
azucreru/ABE
bacterianu/BF
baldadura/BE
bambolla/BE
baquía/BE
barcu/BE
barrenderu/Bf
báscula/BE
batifondu/BE
bázcaru/BE
belixerante/BE
berllétanu/BE
bicuerdu/BF
billongu/BF
bípedu/BF
bisnietu/Bf
blimbaléu/BE
bociadera/BE
bollina/BE
borbónicu/BF
borronáu/BE
braguetu/BF
brida/Be
brunu/BE
bufanda/BE
burlla/BE
buzacarra/BE
cabo/B
cácabu/BE
cachiparra/BE
cadarciu/BE
cagaderu/BE
calabáu/BE
calavía/BE
caldriellu/BE
callarota/BE
calzonciellu/BE
camentamientu/BE
camudamientu/BE
candilexa/BE
cañalizu/BE
carambelu/BE
caretudu/BF
carrancha/BE
cartería/BE
castañuela/BE
cavilgu/BE
celda/BE
cerca/BE
chamaricu/BE
chascadura/BE
chirona/BE
chulu/BF
cimble/BE
cisguada/Be
cloratu/BE
cogoruta/BE
colorada/Be
complexidá/Be
conflictivu/BF
contindaxe/BE
copernicanu/BF
corola/BE
corte/BE
costinada/Be
crencha/BE
cuadrángulu/BE
cuchera/BE
culladeru/BF
cuspíu/BF
deburera/BE
demócrata/BE
desacambadura/BE
descendiente/B
desferramientu/BE
detalle/BE
diezmilésimu/BF
distancia/BE
dosmillonésimu/BF
eclesiásticu/ABF
ecónomu/ABf
efectivu/ABF
electrolizar/ADG
embabiecar/ADG
embaranzu/ABE
embarramientu/ABE
embocador/Af
embrocamientu/ABE
emigrar/ADG
empaletáu/ABE
empanzurriar/ADG
empatía/ABE
empezadura/ABE
empobinamientu/ABE
emprincipiar/ADG
enabiu/ABE
encabalgar/ADG
encamentamientu/ABE
encarafuñáu/ABF
encaxar/ADG
enchapláu/ABF
enchirolar/ADG
encolláu/ABF
encuadrar/ADG
enderechador/AF
enérxicu/ABF
enfastiadura/ABE
enfocicar/ADG
engafuráu/ABF
engardir/ADG
engorriosu/ABF
enguifar/ADG
enlladriyadura/ABE
enllargar/ADG
enoxar/ADG
enredollar/ADG
enromadoriu/ABE
enseñante/AB
ensomu/ABE
entamadura/ABE
entemediu/ABE
entiznar/ADG
entrastayar/ADG
entremesíu/ABF
entretener/ADH
envalentonar/ADG
envolcada/ABe
enxullu/ABE
epicureísmu/ABE
epidemioloxía/ABE
equivocación/Ae
esbachar/ADG
esbarrión/Ae
esbilladeru/ABE
esbocexar/ADG
escabezamientu/ABE
escalabradura/ABE
escallasnáu/ABF
escandalexar/ADG
escantonazu/ABE
escarabayudu/ABF
escaritar/ADG
escarríu/ABE
escazán/AF
esceuto/AB
esclamar/ADG
escolaridá/ABe
esconce/ABE
escorgullar/ADG
escotamientu/ABE
escotilla/ABE
escuaxeringar/ADG
esculpar/ADG
escuxurciar/ADG
esfamiáu/ABF
esfollamientu/ABE
esgarrapatáu/ABF
esguedeyáu/ABF
esguileru/ABE
esllechadura/ABE
esmesáu/ABF
esmilanáu/ABF
esófagu/ABE
españolada/ABe
espartanu/ABF
espatuxadura/ABE
espeñicamientu/ABE
espigu/ABE
espiguiellu/ABE
esplosión/Ae
espresionismu/ABE
esquí/ABE
esquina/ABE
estái/ABE
estaramáu/ABE
estatista/ABE
esterilidá/ABe
estoicu/ABF
estorneyáu/ABF
estrafalerada/ABe
estraxáu/ABF
estrincu/ABE
estriñimientu/ABE
estudiosu/ABF
etnollingüísticu/ABF
euforia/ABE
executivu/ABF
faizada/Be
fandoscu/BF
farriu/BE
felechina/BE
fervorosu/BF
filispa/BE
flatu/BE
folixa/BE
fóricu/BF
foyanquina/BE
frigoríficu/BF
funerariu/BF
gafientu/BF
galvanismu/BE
garapuyu/BE
garulla/BE
glaucoma/BE
gonciu/BE
gramínea/BE
grotescu/BF
güeru/BF
gurrubeyu/BE
hemeroteca/BE
hidrostáticu/BF
homuxu/BE
identidá/ABe
illumináu/ABF
imbécil/AE
imprentón/Ae
incalificable/ABE
inciertu/ABF
inconsistencia/ABE
indicación/Ae
indostánicu/ABE
industrial/AE
informalidá/ABe
innomable/ABE
insatisfechu/ABF
instrumentista/AB
intermediu/ABE
inundación/Ae
inxeniería/ABE
iridiu/ABE
iterativu/ABF
laicu/BF
llaboriosu/BF
llambiatu/BE
llanzaina/BE
llaváu/BE
lletráu/Bf
llinda/BE
llobiu/BE
lloxa/BE
luminotecnia/BE
mafañera/BE
malvarrubiu/BE
maniatáu/BF
maquinista/B
marnuetu/BF
matrimoniu/BE
mecanográficu/BF
melva/BE
mesoriazu/BE
mianu/BF
mincha/BE
mochorru/BE
monografía/BE
morera/BE
mosqueteru/Bf
muleta/BE
nacencia/BE
nave/BE
netu/BE
nombráu/BF
nunciu/Bf
ñisa/BE
observatoriu/ABE
ocre/ABE
octogonal/AE
oligarca/AB
opacu/ABF
ópticu/ABF
ordenación/Ae
ormar/ADG
osera/ABE
otiáu/ABF
oxalá/AB
palangreru/BE
pampolludu/BF
pañeru/Bf
parasintéticu/BF
parrusa/BE
patatu/BE
payote/BE
pelagatu/BF
penitenciariu/BF
pericu/BF
peru/BE
pezopé/B
pidigañeru/BF
pingareta/BE
pistachu/BE
platelmintu/BE
podriellu/BE
ponche/BE
pospazu/BF
predilectu/BF
primaliega/BE
proselitismu/BE
puestu/BE
quebráu/BF
quiridiu/BE
radioaficionáu/Bf
rancuayu/BE
rateru/BF
rebodu/BE
recreativu/BF
refuelle/BE
reló/BE
repampliñu/BE
rescampla/BE
restaurante/BE
reverendu/Bf
rincha/BE
rodete/BE
roxadura/BE
sabanáu/BE
salguera/BE
santabárbara/BE
sayu/BE
semestre/BE
serdudu/BF
sicoloxista/BE
sinceridá/Be
sobrecama/BE
solanu/BF
sonambulismu/BE
sotambiu/BE
suétanu/BE
sutevalute/B
taleruelu/BE
taragañazu/BE
tartexu/BF
telgu/BF
tercia/BE
texanu/BF
tisne/BE
tónica/BE
tornu/BE
traciu/BF
trasgu/BE
trescendencia/BE
trimu/Bf
tronqueru/Bf
tunisca/BE
u/ABE
ultraísta/ABE
únicu/ABF
unixénitu/ABF
urníu/ABE
uz/AE
vaciu/BE
varazu/BE
venereu/BF
vergoña/BE
vidueñu/BF
vista/BE
xabascu/BE
xaréu/BE
xenxigua/BE
xilgueru/BE
xitu/BF
xungla/BE
zabarceru/Bf
zaparrastru/BE
zarzuela/BE
zurzulique/BE
